Nebraska, session 109, LB703.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB703 LB703
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 81-2604, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2604 The functions of the commission are to:
(1) Promote state and federal legislation beneficial to the African
American community in Nebraska;
(2) Coordinate programs relating to the African American community
in Nebraska regarding housing, education, welfare, medical and dental
care, employment, economic development, law and order, and related
problems;
(3) Work with other state and federal government agencies and
federal and state elected officials in the development of programs in
areas mentioned in subdivision (2) of this section;
(4) Keep the Governor's office apprised of the situation in the
African American community in Nebraska;
(5) Administer sections 81-2601 to 81-2607;
(6) Provide the public with information and education relevant to
African American affairs in Nebraska; and
(7) Develop programs to encourage the total involvement of African
American people in activities for the common benefit of the African
American community; and .
(8) Develop an exchange program with the Republic of Ghana. It is
the intent of the Legislature to appropriate one million dollars annually
for the exchange program beginning in fiscal year 2026-27.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-2604, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-